Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-254
Authority; bond issuance; general obligation; how paid and secured.

Unless otherwise expressly provided by the authority, every issue of its bonds shall be general obligations of the authority payable solely out of any revenue or money of the authority, subject only to any agreements with the holders of particular bonds pledging any particular money or revenue. The bonds may be additionally secured by a pledge of any grant or contribution from the federal government or any corporation, association, institution, or person or a pledge of any money, income, or revenue of the authority from any source.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 54;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 54.